Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.856

Divulging investigative information prohibited—Confidentiality—Security of records and files.

(1)(a) On and after April 26, 1973, it shall be unlawful for any person to divulge specific investigative information pertaining to activities related to organized crime which he or she has obtained by reason of public employment with the state of Washington or its political subdivisions unless such person is authorized or required to do so by operation of state or federal law.

(b) Any person violating (a) of this subsection is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 43.43.854, or pursuant to the rules of the supreme court of Washington, all of the information and data collected and processed by the organized crime intelligence unit shall be confidential and not subject to examination or publication pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.

(3) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall prescribe such standards and procedures relating to the security of the records and files of the organized crime intelligence unit, as he or she deems to be in the public interest with the advice of the governor and the board.

[ 2005 c 274 s 298; 2003 c 53 s 230; 1973 1st ex.s. c 202 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.